Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-3,193.01
International Registration Plan; adopted.

For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, the International Registration Plan is adopted and incorporated by reference as the plan existed on January 1, 2025.

Laws 2008, LB756, § 10;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB805, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB212, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 14;

Laws 2013, LB35, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB776, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB313, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB929, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 55;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 69;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 25;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 8;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 30;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 14;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 32.